Wyoming, session 2026, HB0049.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-9-113 is amended to read:

22-9-113. Completing and return of ballot.

Upon receipt, a qualified elector shall mark the ballot and
sign the affidavit. The ballot shall then be sealed in the
inner ballot envelope and mailed or hand delivered to the
clerk. No county clerk, election staff of the county clerk,
public employee or election official shall establish or use
HB0049

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0041
a drop box for the purpose of collecting absentee ballots
and no person shall deliver an absentee ballot through any
drop box. If a ballot is improperly delivered to the county
clerk in violation of this section, the clerk may provide
notice to the qualified elector that the qualified
elector's ballot is spoiled. As used in this section, "drop
box" means any receptacle designed for the receipt of
absentee ballots, or for receipt of any other type of
filing, payment or other document, that would in any way
permit the delivery of an absentee ballot in a manner other
than through mail or hand delivery as required by this
section.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0049